Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-126
License to corporation; conditions.

No corporation organized under the laws of this state, any other state, or any foreign country shall be issued any license provided for in the Nebraska Liquor Control Act unless such corporation is duly registered with the Secretary of State to transact business in this state. If such corporation is owned by a corporation, the owning corporation shall also be duly registered with the Secretary of State to transact business in this state.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 33, p. 398;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-333;

R.S.1943, § 53-126;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 75;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 31.

Agent of corporation licensee must be satisfactory to and approved by the commission with respect to his character. C & L Co. v. Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, 190 Neb. 91, 206 N.W.2d 49 (1973).

In exercising discretion to refuse license, Nebraska Liquor Control Commission may consider factors in addition to those set out in this section. T & N P Co., Inc. v. Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, 189 Neb. 708, 204 N.W.2d 809 (1973).